Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-146
National Guard; personnel; ordered to active duty; limitations.

Officers and enlisted personnel of the National Guard who are active or retired may be ordered to active service of the state by the Governor or the Adjutant General: (1) During times of disaster declared by the Governor; (2) in any emergency when the lives or the property of the people of this state are endangered; and (3) at any time for advice, counsel, duties, or service to the Governor or Adjutant General. The length of service of any individual ordered to active service of the state for disasters or emergencies shall be determined by the Adjutant General. The length of service for any individual ordered to active service of the state for advice, counsel, duties, or service to the Governor or Adjutant General shall not exceed fifteen continuous days for any one mission or project, and no more than fifteen individuals shall be ordered to such duty for any one mission or project.

Laws 1955, c. 213, § 1, p. 598;

Laws 1963, c. 321, § 1, p. 975;

Laws 1965, c. 341, § 1, p. 971;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-121.01;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 44, p. 1596;

Laws 1984, LB 934, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 930, § 1.